Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2238.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 46-1210 is hereby amended to read as follows:
46-1210. (a) There is hereby established the legislative research
department whose head shall be the director of legislative research and
who shall be appointed by the legislative coordinating council to serve
under its the direction of the council. The director of legislative
research may be removed from office by a vote of five (5) members of
the legislative coordinating council taken at any regular meeting of
such council. The director of legislative research shall receive such
compensation as is determined by the legislative coordinating council.
Such director, and any of his or her such director's assistants specified
by the legislative coordinating council, shall receive expenses and
allowances for in-state and out-of-state travel as is provided by law for
members of the legislature. Such director shall appoint such assistants
and employees of the legislative research department as are authorized
by the legislative coordinating council and shall set their compensation
subject to the approval of such council. Such director and all assistants
and employees of the legislative research department shall be in the
unclassified service.
(b) The legislative research department shall perform legislative
research functions and such other duties as are directed by the
legislative coordinating council.
(c) The legislative research department shall provide staff services
to all meetings of special committees, select committees, joint
committees and standing committees meeting when the legislature is
not in session, and to the extent possible, accomplish the following:
(1) Assist each committee chairman chairperson in planning the
work of the committee, and in accordance with the chairman's
chairperson's instructions prepare an agenda for each meeting.
(2) Appropriately notify committee members, staff and other
interested persons of meeting times and other information as directed
by the committee chairman chairperson.
(3) Prepare minutes of each committee meeting to show
attendance, disposition of agenda items, tentative and final committee
decisions and staff instructions, and such other matters as may be
helpful to the work of the committee.
(4) Prepare and present research information in accordance with
committee instructions or instructions of the committee chairman
chairperson.
(5) Obtain attendance of persons for committee presentations or
testimony. In cases of compulsory process, work with the office of
revisor of statutes and office of attorney general to obtain satisfactory
results.
(6) Prepare interim reports of committee work when the same is
such reports are requested of a committee by the legislative
coordinating council. Any such report shall have committee approval
before transmission.
(7) Prepare a final committee report in accordance with committee
instructions; the same to. Such report shall include relevant
information, committee policy recommendations, and to the extent
possible, appropriate bill drafts prepared by the office of revisor of
statutes.
(8) Receive and analyze agency requests for appropriations and
prepare fiscal information for appropriate legislative committees.
(d) Special committees, select committees and standing
committees are expected to shall utilize the foregoing such staff
services to the extent the same are as available in making all studies.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 46-1212a is hereby amended to read as follows: 46-
1212a. (a) There is hereby established the division of legislative
administrative services whose head shall be the director of legislative

HOUSE BILL No. 2238—page 2
administrative services and who shall be appointed by the legislative
coordinating council to serve under its the direction of the council. The
director of legislative administrative services may be removed from
office by a vote of five (5) members of the legislative coordinating
council taken at any regular meeting of such council. The director of
legislative administrative services shall receive such compensation as is
determined by the legislative coordinating council. Such director, and
any of such director's assistants specified by the legislative
coordinating council, shall receive expenses and allowances for in-state
and out-of-state travel as is provided by law for members of the
legislature. Such director shall appoint such assistants and employees
of the division of legislative administrative services as are authorized
by the legislative coordinating council and shall set their compensation
subject to the approval of such council. Such director and all assistants
and employees of the division of legislative administrative services
shall be in the unclassified service.
(b) The division of legislative administrative services shall
provide administrative staff services to and for the elected officers and
the majority and minority leaders of the house of representatives and
the senate and for the legislative branch, as directed by the legislative
coordinating council, by performing the following functions:
(1) Acquiring legislative equipment, facilities and supplies.
(2) Administering the personnel documents and records of
members of the legislature and employees of the legislative branch,
except officers and employees of the legislative research department,
office of revisor of statutes, division of post audit and such other
legislative commissions as may be specifically excepted herefrom by
law.
(3) Recruiting and supervising personnel for administrative and
secretarial duties as specified by the legislative coordinating council.
(4) Prepare minutes of each special committee, select committee,
joint committee and standing committee meeting, whether the
legislature is in session or not in session, to show attendance of
members of the legislature, disposition of agenda items, tentative and
final committee decisions and staff instructions and such other matters
as may be helpful to the work of the committee.
(5) Working with the legislative research department to provide
notices in appropriate detail of legislative study committee meetings
and such other matters as are directed by the legislative coordinating
council.
(5)(6) Performing such other duties as directed by the legislative
coordinating council.

HOUSE BILL No. 2238—page 3
Sec. 3. K.S.A. 46-1210 and 46-1212a are hereby repealed.
Sec. 4. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.
I hereby certify that the above BILL originated in the HOUSE, and passed
that body
Speaker of the House.
Chief Clerk of the House.
Passed the SENATE
______________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
Secretary of the Senate.
APPROVED
__________________________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.